North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-36 Pesticide and Pesticide Container Disposal Program

Source:

S.L. 2017, sb2027, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-36-01.
Pesticide and pesticide container disposal program — Pesticide container management — Compensation.

The definitions contained in section 4.1-33-01 apply to this chapter.

In consultation with an advisory board consisting of the state health officer and director of the North Dakota state university extension service, two individuals selected by the agriculture commissioner representing agribusiness organizations, and two individuals selected by the agriculture commissioner representing farm organizations, the commissioner shall continue to implement project safe send. The purpose of the project is to:

Collect and either recycle or dispose of unusable pesticides and unusable pesticide containers. The commissioner shall provide for the establishment and operation of temporary collection sites for the pesticides and pesticide containers. The commissioner may limit the type and quantity of pesticides and pesticide containers acceptable for collection.

Promote proper pesticide container management. In consultation with the director of the North Dakota state university extension service, the commissioner shall evaluate and promote proper methods of pesticide container management, including information on the variety of pesticide containers available.

Any entity collecting pesticide containers or unusable pesticides shall manage and dispose of the containers and pesticides in compliance with applicable federal and state requirements. When called upon, any state agency shall assist the commissioner in implementing the project.

For services rendered in connection with the design and implementation of this project, the advisory board members selected by the commissioner are entitled to reimbursement for mileage and travel expenses in the same manner and for the same amounts provided for state employees and officials. Compensation and expense reimbursement must be paid from the environment and rangeland protection fund.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-36-02.
Project scope and evaluation.

The project described in section 4.1-36-01 must occur in areas to be determined by the agriculture commissioner in consultation with the advisory board described in section 4.1-36-01.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-36-03.
Project safe send pesticide and pesticide container collection — User fees.

The agriculture commissioner, in consultation with the advisory board for the project safe send pesticide and pesticide container disposal program, may charge a fee for collection of rinsate. The fees must be established at a level that will generate enough revenue to cover the cost of disposal associated with the rinsate that is collected. Collections from this fee must be deposited in the environment and rangeland protection fund.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-36-04.
Report on pesticide container disposal program.

The agriculture commissioner shall submit a biennial report to a joint meeting of the house of representatives and senate agriculture committees on the status of the pesticide container disposal program.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.